Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 18 Municipal Road and Bridge Revolving Fund

24-18-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Road and Bridge Revolving Fund Act of 2013.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.

24-18-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Transportation plays a critical role in enabling economic activity in the state of Rhode Island;

Cities and towns can lower the costs of borrowing for road and bridge projects through cooperation with the Rhode Island infrastructure bank;

The Clean Water and Drinking Water Fund programs administered by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank benefit from the highest bond rating of any public entity in the state of Rhode Island; and

Greater coordination among cities and towns will enable more efficient allocation of infrastructure resources by the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 2.

24-18-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms, unless the context requires a different interpretation, shall have the following meanings:

“Agency” means the Rhode Island infrastructure bank as set forth in chapter 12.2 of title 46;

“Annual construction plan” means the finalized list of approved projects to commence construction each calendar year;

“Approved project” means any project approved by the agency for financial assistance;

“Department” means the department of transportation, or, if the department shall be abolished, the board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or upon whom the powers given by chapter 5 of title 37 to the department shall be given by law;

“Eligible project” means an infrastructure plan, or portion of an infrastructure plan, that meets the project evaluation criteria;

“Financial assistance” means any form of financial assistance other than grants provided by the agency to a city or town in accordance with this chapter for all or any part of the cost of an approved project, including, without limitation, temporary and permanent loans, with or without interest, guarantees, insurance, subsidies for the payment of debt service on loans, lines of credit, and similar forms of financial assistance;

“Infrastructure plan” means a project proposed by a city or town that would make capital improvements to roads, bridges, and appurtenances thereto consistent with project evaluation criteria;

“Market rate” means the rate the city or town would receive in the open market at the time of the original loan agreement as determined by the agency in accordance with its rules and regulations;

“Project evaluation criteria” means the criteria used by the department to evaluate infrastructure plans and rank eligible projects and shall include, but not be limited to:

The extent to which the project generates economic benefits;

The extent to which the project would be able to proceed at an earlier date;

The likelihood that the project would provide mobility benefits;

The cost effectiveness of the project;

The likelihood that the project would increase safety; and

The project’s readiness to proceed within the forthcoming calendar year.

“Project priority list” means the list of eligible projects ranked in the order in which financial assistance shall be awarded by the agency pursuant to §

24-18-7

;

“Revolving fund” means the municipal road and bridge revolving fund established under §

24-18-4

; and

“Subsidy assistance” means credit enhancements and other measures to reduce the borrowing costs for a city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 1.

24-18-4.
Establishment of the municipal road and bridge revolving fund.

There is hereby established a municipal road and bridge revolving fund. The agency shall establish and set up on its books the revolving fund, to be held in trust and to be administered by the agency solely as provided in this chapter and in any trust agreement securing bonds of the agency. The agency shall deposit the following monies into the fund:

Amounts appropriated or designated to the agency by the state for the purposes of this chapter;

Loan repayments and other payments received by the agency pursuant to loan agreements with cities and towns executed in accordance with this chapter;

Investment earnings on amounts credited to the fund;

Proceeds of bonds of the agency to the extent required by any trust agreement for such bonds;

Administrative fees levied by the agency;

Other amounts required by provisions of this chapter or agreement, or any other law or any trust agreement pertaining to bonds to be credited to the revolving fund; and

Any other funds permitted by law which the agency in its discretion shall determine to credit thereto.

The agency shall establish and maintain fiscal controls and accounting procedures conforming to generally accepted government accounting standards sufficient to ensure proper accounting for receipts in and disbursements from the revolving fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.

24-18-5.
Administration.

The agency shall have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter including, without limiting the generality of the preceding statement, the authority:

To receive and disburse such funds from the state as may be available for the purpose of the revolving fund subject to the provisions of this chapter;

To make and enter into binding commitments to provide financial assistance to local cities and towns from amounts on deposit in the revolving fund;

To enter into binding commitments to provide subsidy assistance for loans and city and town obligations from amounts on deposit in the revolving fund;

To levy administrative fees on cities and towns as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter, provided the fees have been previously authorized by an agreement between the agency and the city or town;

To engage the services of third-party vendors to provide professional services; and

To establish one or more accounts within the revolving fund; and

Such other authority as granted to the agency under chapter 12.2 of title 46.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, to the provisions of any agreement with the state authorized by §

24-18-6

, and to any agreements with the holders of any bonds of the agency or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the agency for the account of the revolving fund shall be applied by the agency, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other funds and accounts held by the agency or maintained under any trust agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the agency, to the following purposes:

To provide financial assistance to cities and towns to finance costs of approved projects, and to refinance the costs of the projects, subject to such terms and conditions, if any, as are determined by the department and/or the agency in accordance with §

24-18-7

;

To fund reserves for bonds of the agency and to purchase insurance and pay the premiums therefor, and pay fees and expenses of letters or lines of credit and costs of reimbursement to the issuers thereof for any payments made thereon or on any insurance, and to otherwise provide security for, and a source of payment for obligations of the agency, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in chapter 12.2 of title 46;

To pay expenses of the agency and the department in administering the revolving fund. As part of the annual appropriations bill, the department shall set forth the gross amount of expenses received from the agency and a complete, specific breakdown of the sums retained and/or expended for administrative expenses;

To pay or provide for subsidy assistance equivalent to one-third (1/3) of the market rate or such other subsidy assistance as determined by the agency;

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, amounts payable by cities and towns on loans and city and town obligations outstanding in the event of default thereof; amounts in any account in the revolving fund may be applied to defaults on loans outstanding to the city or town for which the account was established and, on a parity basis with all other accounts, to defaults on any loans or city or town obligations outstanding; and

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in chapter 12.2 of title 46, any bonds of the agency.

In addition to other remedies of the agency under any loan agreement or otherwise provided by law, the agency may also recover from a city or town, in an action in superior court, any amount due the agency together with any other actual damages the agency shall have sustained from the failure or refusal of the city or town to make the payments or abide by the terms of the loan agreement.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the agency shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: a summary of the agency’s meetings including when the agency met, subjects addressed, decisions rendered and meeting minutes; a summary of the agency’s actions including a listing of rules, regulations, or procedures adopted or amended, applications received for financial assistance for contracts or agreements entered into, applications and intended use plans submitted to federal agencies for capitalization grants, properties acquired or leased, and bonds issued; a synopsis of any complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the agency; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and disbursed by the agency including the source of and recipient of the funds which shall be audited by an independent certified public accountant firm; copies of audits or reports required under federal law; a listing of the staff and/or consultants employed by the agency; a listing of findings and recommendation derived from agency activities; and a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies. The report shall be posted as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision. The initial report shall be due no later than January 1, 2015.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.

24-18-6.
Payment of state funds.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (b), upon the written request of the agency, the general treasurer shall pay to the agency, from time to time, from the proceeds of any bonds or notes issued by the state for the purposes of this chapter or funds otherwise lawfully payable to the agency for the purposes of this chapter, such amounts as shall have been appropriated or lawfully designated for the revolving fund. All amounts so paid shall be credited to the revolving fund in addition to any other amounts credited or expected to be credited to the revolving fund.

The agency and the state shall enter into, execute, and deliver one or more agreements setting forth or otherwise determining the terms, conditions, and procedures for, and the amount, time, and manner of payment of, all amounts available from the state to the agency under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.

24-18-7.
Procedure for project approval.

By September 1, 2013, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing the project evaluation criteria and the process through which a city or town may submit an infrastructure plan. By December 31, 2013, the agency shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this chapter which may include, without limitation, forms for financial assistance applications, loan agreements, and other instruments. All rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

Cities and towns shall submit infrastructure plans to the department in accordance with the department’s rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

The department shall evaluate all submitted infrastructure plans and, in accordance with the project evaluation criteria, identify all eligible projects, and after a public hearing, the department shall finalize and provide the agency and statewide planning with a project priority list. The agency shall not award financial assistance to any project not listed on the project priority list.

The agency shall not obligate more than fifty percent (50%) of available funding in any calendar year to any one city or town unless there are no other eligible projects on the project priority list.

Upon issuance of the project priority list, the agency shall award financial assistance to cities and towns for approved projects. The agency may decline to award financial assistance to an approved project that the agency determines will have a substantial adverse effect on the interests of holders of bonds or other indebtedness of the agency or the interests of other participants in the financial assistance program, or for good and sufficient cause affecting the finances of the agency. All financial assistance shall be made pursuant to a loan agreement between the agency and the city or town, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer, according to terms and conditions as determined by the agency, and each loan shall be evidenced and secured by the issue to the agency of city or town obligations in fully marketable form in principal amount, bearing interest at the rate or rates specified in the applicable loan agreement, and shall otherwise bear such terms and conditions as authorized by this chapter and/or the loan agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 1.

24-18-8.
Inspection of approved projects.

For any approved project, the department shall have the authority to inspect the construction and operation thereof to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.

24-18-9.
Expenses incurred by the department.

In order to provide for the expenses of the department under this chapter, the agency shall transfer to the department an amount from the revolving fund equal to the amount authorized by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.

24-18-10.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 1.